apertium-ain.ain.lexc
LEXICON VerbPrefix-ClassIII 

%[%-appl%]:エ VerbPrefix-ClassII ;
%[%-appl%]:コ VerbPrefix-ClassII ;
%[%-appl%]:オ VerbPrefix-ClassII ;
VerbRoot ;

LEXICON Verb-TV

%<v%>%<tv%>:  RegVerbInfl ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pasv1%>%[%+pasv1%]:  # ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pasv2%>%[%+pasv2%]:  # ;

LEXICON Verb-IV

%<v%>%<iv%>:  RegVerbInfl ; 
%<v%>%<iv%>%<advz%>:%>ノ # ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<tvx%>%[%+tvx%]:  # ;

LEXICON RegVerbInfl

# ;
%<v%>:%> Diminutive ;
%<int%>%[%+int%]:  VerbSuffix-ClassVI ;
%<nmlz%>%<abs%>:%>% イ VerbSuffix-ClassVI ;
%<nmlz%>%<abs%>:%>% ヒ VerbSuffix-ClassVI ;
%<pasv1%>%[%+pasv1%]: NounInfl-Common ;
%<pasv1%>%[%+pasv1%]: VerbSuffix-ClassVI ;
%<pasv2%>%[%+pasv2%]: NounInfl-Common ;
%<pasv2%>%[%+pasv2%]: VerbSuffix-ClassVI ;
%<acaus%>%[%+acaus%]: VerbSuffix-ClassVI ; 
%<vaux%>%<vpres%>:シリネ VerbSuffix-ClassVI ;
%<pl%>:パ VerbSuffix-ClassVI ;
%<comp%>%[%+comp%]:  VerbSuffix-ClassVI ;
%<sup%>%[%+sup%]:  VerbSuffix-ClassVI ;
%<p1%>%<sg%>%[%+1ps%]:  VerbSuffix-ClassVI ;
%<p2%>%<pos%>%[%+2p%]%[%+pos%]:  VerbSuffix-ClassVI ;
%<apass%>%[%+apass%]: VerbSuffix-ClassVI ;
%<refl%>%[%+refl%]: VerbSuffix-ClassVI ;
%<sg%>%<2pS%>%[%+2spl%]: VerbSuffix-ClassVI ;
%<pl%>%<2pS%>%[%+2ssg%]: VerbSuffix-ClassVI ;
%<1pS%>%[%+1s%]: VerbSuffix-ClassVI ;
%<p4%>%[%+idef%]: VerbSuffix-ClassVI ;
%<appl%>%[%+appl%]:  VerbSuffix-ClassVI ;

VerbSuffix-ClassVI ;

LEXICON VerbSuffix-ClassVI 

# ;
%<caus%>:%>レ VerbPersonalSuffix ;
%<caus%>:%>テ VerbPersonalSuffix ;
VerbPersonalSuffix ;

LEXICON VerbPersonalSuffix

# ;
%<p4%>:アン # ;

LEXICON Diminutive

%<dim%>:%>ポ # ;

LEXICON NounInfl-utara
%<n%>%<pl%>:%>% ウタラ # ;
NounInfl-Common ;

LEXICON NounInfl-U
%<n%>%<pl%>:%>%{U%} # ;
NounInfl-Common ;

LEXICON NounInfl-preU

%<n%>%<pl%>%[%+pl%]: # ;
NounInfl-Common ;

LEXICON NounInfl-Nu
%<n%>%<pl%>:%>ヌ # ;
NounInfl-Common ;

LEXICON NounInfl-Irreg
%<n%>%<pl%>:  # ;
NounInfl-Common ;

LEXICON NounInfl-Common

%<n%>: Diminutive ;
%<nmlz%>:%>% ㇷ゚ # ;
%<pn%>%<px1sg%>%<mf%>:%>コロ Diminutive ;
%<n%>%<vz%>:%>コロ  # ;
%<n%>%<vz%>:%>カラ  # ;
%<n%>%<det%>%<ind%>%[%+dInd%]:  # ;
%<n%>%<det%>%<def%>%[%+dDef%]:  # ;
%<n%>%<sg%>%[%+sg%]:  # ;
%<n%>%<m%>%[%+m%]:  # ;
%<n%>%<mg%>%[%+mg%]:  # ;
%<n%>%<f%>%[%+f%]:  # ;
%<n%>%<end1%>:%>% トノケ # ;
%<n%>%<end2%>:%>% ポ # ;
%<n%>%<hon%>:%>% ニㇱパケ # ;
%<n%>%<poss%>:%>%{w%}ェ # ;
%<n%>:  # ;
%<n%>%<cn%>%<pos%>%[%+pos%]:イヒ # ;


LEXICON NounInfl-Relational

%<n%>%<rn%>%<pos%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%[%+pp1sg%]:  # ;
%<n%>%<rn%>%<pos%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:ア # ;

!LEXICON Verb-IV
!
!%<adj%>%<adv%>:%>タラ # ;
!%<adj%>%<pl%>:%>パ # ;
!%<adj%>:%> AbstractNoun ;
!%<adj%>%<comp%>%[%+comp%]:  # ;
!%<adj%>%<sup%>%[%+sup%]:  # ;
!%<v%>%<iv%>%<nmlz%>%<abs%>:%>% イ # ;
!%<v%>%<iv%>%<nmlz%>%<abs%>:%>% ヒ # ;
!%<v%>%<iv%>%<nmlz%>:%>% ㇷ゚ # ; 
!%<adj%>:  # ;

!LEXICON AbstractNoun
!%<n%>%<abs%>:ポ Diminutive ;

!LEXICON Verb-IV
!
!%<adv%>:%>ノ # ;


LEXICON Copula

%<v%>%<cop%>:  # ;
%<v%>%<cop%>%<p4%>[%+idef%]:  # ;

!LEXICON Verb-IV
!
!%<adj%>:%>テ Verb-IV ;


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                          L E X I C O N                                  !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Clitic

アナㇰ%<cli%>%<top%>:アナㇰ # ;
アナㇰネ%<cli%>%<top%>:アナㇰネ # ;
ヒケ%<cli%>%<nmlz%>:ヒケ  # ; ! with regards to X

LEXICON Pronoun

アオカィ%<n%>%<pn%>:アオカィ # ;

LEXICON Adverb

エネ%<adv%>:エネ # ; ! thus/so/in such a way
ソモ%<adv%>:ソモ # ; ! negation
イテキ%<adv%>:イテキ # ; ! negative command
オㇿタ%<adv%>:オㇿタ # ; ! in which
オラノ%<adv%>:オラノ # ; ! then 
ポロンノ%<adv%>:ポロンノ # ; ! very much
ウサ%<adv%>:ウサ  # ; ! various
アシンノ%<adv%>:アシンノ  # ; ! first time
タネ%<adv%>:タネ  # ; ! now
ネノ%<adv%>:ネノ  # ; ! same as
アッカリ%<adv%>:アッカリ  # ; ! than (comparative) TODO: get prefixes to work here
シノ%<adv%>:シノ  # ; ! truly 

LEXICON PostPosition

タ%<pp%>:タ # ; ! at
パㇰノ%<pp%>:パㇰノ # ; ! until
アニ%<pp%>:アニ # ; ! final particle/
ピㇱノ%<pp%>:ピㇱノ # ; ! every TODO: fix no-suffix 
ウン%<pp%>:ウン # ; ! to
ワノ%<pp%>:ワノ # ; ! from
ㇷ゚%<pp%>%<nmlz%>:ㇷ゚ # ; ! -thing
オロ%<pp%>:オロ  # ; ! place-poss (TODO: reconsider POSS-suffixing)
エウン%<pp%>:エウン  # ; ! there.at/to


LEXICON Auxiliary

ア%<perf%>%<sg%>:ア # ; 
ナンコㇿ%<v%>%<vaux%>:ナンコㇿ # ; ! TODO: fix this logic
クニ%<comp%>:クニ # ; ! comparative mood
エアㇱカィ%<v%>%<vaux%>:エアㇱカィ # ; ! be able to X
エアㇱカイ%<v%>%<vaux%>:エアㇱカイ # ; ! Dir/LR
エアイカㇷ゚%<v%>%<vaux%>:エアイカㇷ゚  # ; ! be unable to X


LEXICON Conjunction

コ%<cnjsub%>:コ # ;
クス%<cnjsub%>:クス # ;
ワ%<cnjcoo%>:ワ # ; ! and
オロワ%<cnjcoo%>:オロワ # ;
ノ%<cnjcoo%>:ノ # ; ! and (old)
ヒネ%<cnjcoo%>:ヒネ # ; ! and (old)
コㇿカ%<cnjcoo%>:コㇿカ # ; ! but
コㇿ%<cnjcoo%>:コㇿ # ; ! when/if
セコㇿ%<quot%>:セコㇿ # ; ! quotation marker
ヤㇰ%<cnjsub%>:ヤㇰ # ; ! if
ヤクン%<cnjsub%>:ヤクン # ; ! if (plus conjunction)
ヤッカ%<cnjcoo%>:ヤッカ  # ; ! if-even
ノイネ%<cnjcoo%>:ノイネ  # ; ! look as if 

LEXICON Determiner

ト゚ㇷ゚%<bn%>%<ndet%>:ト゚ㇷ゚ # ;

LEXICON Nominalizer

ヒ%<nmlz%>:ヒ # ;
イ%<nmlz%>:イ # ;
ルウェ%<nmlz%>%<ev%>%<infr%>:ルウェ # ;

LEXICON Particle 

カ%<prt%>%<adv%>:カ # ;
ロ%<prt%>%<chrt%>:ロ # ;

LEXICON Exclamation

アニ%<exc%>:アニ # ;

LEXICON ProperNoun

アㇱカンネ% ラマㇳ%<np%>:アㇱカンネ% ラマㇳ # ;
ヨロタン%<np%>:ヨロタン # ; ! jordan
イェス%<np%>:イェス # ; ! jesus

LEXICON Number

0%<num%>:0  # ;
1%<num%>:1  # ;
2%<num%>:2  # ;
3%<num%>:3  # ;
4%<num%>:4  # ;
5%<num%>:5  # ;
6%<num%>:6  # ;
7%<num%>:7  # ;
8%<num%>:8  # ;
9%<num%>:9  # ;
10%<num%>:10  # ;
11%<num%>:11  # ;
12%<num%>:12  # ;

LEXICON Punctuation

.%<sent%>:. # ;
..%<sent%>:.. # ;
...%<sent%>:... # ;
%;%<sent%>:%; # ;
%:%<sent%>:%: # ;
%!%<sent%>:%! # ;
%-%<guio%>:%- # ;
%—%<guio%>:%— # ;
,%<cm%>:, # ;
%?%<sent%>:%? # ;
%'%<apos%>:%' # ;
%"%<sent%>:%" # ;
%«%<lquot%>:%« # ;
%»%<rquot%>:%» # ;
%”%<rquot%>:%” # ;
%“%<lquot%>:%“ # ;
%(%<lpar%>:%( # ;
%]%<rpar%>:%] # ;
%[%<lpar%>:%[ # ;
%)%<rpar%>:%) # ;
\%<sent%>:\ # ;
/%<sent%>:/ # ;

! Resources:
! http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Starting_a_new_language_with_HFST#Lexicon
! http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Lttoolbox_and_lexc
! http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Apertium-specific_conventions_for_lexc
! https://kitwiki.csc.fi/twiki/bin/view/KitWiki/HfstHome
! http://hfst.sourceforge.net/
! http://www.cis.upenn.edu/~cis639/docs/lexc.html
! http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Hfst

LEXICON NounRoot
チ:チ NounInfl-Common ; !
ク:ク NounInfl-Common ; !
ポンペ:ポンペ NounInfl-Common ; !
オッカィ:オッカィ NounInfl-Common ; !
チㇱナィ:チㇱナィ NounInfl-Common ; !
イキリ:イキリ NounInfl-Common ; ! a seam 
シセイ:シセイ NounInfl-Common ; ! a house
ハウ:ハウ NounInfl-Common ; ! the voice
カヤ:カヤ NounInfl-Common ; ! a sail
アイアイ:アイアイ NounInfl-utara ; !
アイヌ:アイヌ NounInfl-utara ; ! human/the Ainu
アシキペㇳ:アシキペㇳ NounInfl-U ; !
アㇳ:ア%{Tt%} NounInfl-U ; !
アㇺ:ア%{Mm%} NounInfl-U ; !
イクㇱペ:%{i%}クㇱペ NounInfl-preU ; !
イタㇰ:イタ%{Kk%} NounInfl-U ; !
イリワㇰ:イリワㇰ NounInfl-preU ; !
ウㇺマ:ウㇺマ NounInfl-utara ; !
クㇳ:ク%{t%} NounInfl-U ; !
ケマ:ケマ NounInfl-preU ; !
チェㇷ゚:チェㇷ゚ NounInfl-Nu ; !
ニシ:ニシ NounInfl-U ; !
ニマキ:ニマキ NounInfl-preU ; !
フラ:フラ NounInfl-Nu ; !
ペ:ペ%{pe%} NounInfl-Irreg ; !
ペㇳ:ペㇳ NounInfl-Irreg ; !
チセイ:チセイ NounInfl-Common ; !
クル:クル NounInfl-Common ; !
チェㇷ゚:チェㇷ゚ NounInfl-Nu ; !
クッペ:クッペ NounInfl-preU ; !
アアㇰ:アアㇰ NounInfl-Common ; 
アニㇱ:アニㇱ NounInfl-Common ; 
アミチ:アミチ NounInfl-Common ; 
アㇰ:アㇰ NounInfl-Common ; 
シㇰ:シㇰ NounInfl-Common ; ! eye
カムィ:カムィ NounInfl-Common ;
サㇺ:サㇺ NounInfl-Relational ;
ル:ル NounInfl-Common ;
ポネ:ポネ NounInfl-Common ; ! bone
ウパㇱ:ウパㇱ NounInfl-Common ; ! snow
フチ:フチ NounInfl-Common ; ! grandmother/old woman
アペ:アペ NounInfl-Common ; ! fire
ケㇺ:ケㇺ NounInfl-Common ; ! blood
アマㇺ:アマㇺ NounInfl-Common ; ! meal (lit. rice/cereals)
マチヤ:マチヤ NounInfl-Common ; ! town
オㇱケ:オㇱケ NounInfl-Common ; ! inside (noun locative)
モンラィケ:モンラィケ NounInfl-Common ; ! work
パロ:パロ NounInfl-Common ; ! mouth (possessive)
カヤ:カヤ NounInfl-Common ; ! sail
クㇽ:クㇽ NounInfl-Common ; ! person
ケマ:ケマ NounInfl-Common ; ! leg
スㇺ:スㇺ NounInfl-Common ; ! oil
チㇷ゚:チㇷ゚ NounInfl-Common ; ! ship
ラㇳチャコ:ラㇳチャコ NounInfl-Common ; ! light
トゥカㇽ:トゥカㇽ NounInfl-Common ; ! seal
ルウェ:ルウェ NounInfl-Common ; ! trace/footprint
ポッペ:ポッペ NounInfl-Common ; ! sweat
サポ:サポ NounInfl-Common ; ! older sister
アマㇺ:アマㇺ NounInfl-Common ; ! rice
アㇷ゚ト:アㇷ゚ト NounInfl-Common ; ! rain
カゥカゥ:カゥカゥ NounInfl-Common ; ! hail
ウㇺマ:ウㇺマ NounInfl-Common ; ! horse
メノコ:メノコ NounInfl-Common ; ! woman
マウェ:マウェ NounInfl-Common ; ! breath
スィ:スィ NounInfl-Common ; ! times
スシルㇷ゚:スシルㇷ゚ NounInfl-Common ; ! pumice stone
チュルㇷ゚:チュルㇷ゚ NounInfl-Common ; ! january
アシㇰネ:アシㇰネ NounInfl-Common ; ! five
エㇽメタㇺプ:エㇽメタㇺプ NounInfl-Common ; ! wart
タンヌ:タンヌ NounInfl-Common ; ! dolphin
パサ:パサ NounInfl-Common ; ! carriage
ニス:ニス NounInfl-Common ; ! mortar
チェㇷ゚:チェㇷ゚  NounInfl-Common ; ! fish
イモㇰ:イモㇰ NounInfl-Common ; ! bait
アㇳコチ:アㇳコチ NounInfl-Common ; ! fishtail
ヤ:ヤ NounInfl-Common ; ! land/shore
セㇾマカセㇽマカ NounInfl-Common ; ! behind
パロ:パロ NounInfl-Common ; ! mouth
クㇳ:クㇳ NounInfl-Common ; ! sash
セィ:セィ NounInfl-Common ; ! shell
ネㇷ゚:ネㇷ゚ NounInfl-Common ; ! what
ウォㇿ:ウォㇿ NounInfl-Common ; ! water (old)
タスㇺ:タスㇺ NounInfl-Common ; ! sickness
エスペラント:エスペラント NounInfl-Common ; ! Esperanto
LEXICON VerbRoot
ラチ:ラチ Verb-IV ; ! be gentle (old)
ハゥケ:ハゥケ Verb-IV ; ! be calm/cheap
ソン:ソン Verb-IV ; ! be true (old) 
ハロ:ハロ Verb-IV ;
ラム:ラム Verb-IV ;
ヌチャㇰ:ヌチャㇰ Verb-IV ;
アㇱカン:アㇱカン Verb-IV ;
ケㇺ:ケㇺ Verb-TV ; ! lick
ヌペキ:ヌペキ Verb-IV ; ! bright
パセ:パセ Verb-IV ; ! heavy
ポロ:ポロ Verb-IV ; ! large
キ:キ Verb-IV ; ! do (auxiliary)
アマ:アマ Verb-TV ; ! put/place
クパ:クパ Verb-TV ; ! bite
ペレパ:ペレパ Verb-TV ; ! cleave/split/break (old)
テレケ:テレケ Verb-IV ; ! jump
イセ:イセ Verb-IV ; ! squeak/sqeal (old)
ミㇰ:ミㇰ Verb-IV ; ! bark
ミナ:ミナ Verb-IV ; ! laugh
キラ:キラ Verb-IV ; ! escape
イタㇰ:イタㇰ Verb-IV ; ! speak
エ:エ Verb-TV ; ! eat
イェ:イェ Verb-TV ; ! say/tell
ヌ:ヌ Verb-TV ; ! hear
ヌイェ:ヌイェ Verb-TV ; ! carve/write/tattoo
ライケ:ライケ Verb-TV ; ! kill
セ:セ Verb-IV ; ! squeak/squeal
ネ:ネ Copula ; ! copula
ピㇼカ:ピㇼカ Verb-IV ; ! be good
ハロコロ:ハロコロ Verb-IV ; ! be fat (old)
アン:アン Verb-IV ; ! exist/live
シノㇳ:シノㇳ Verb-IV ; ! play (have fun)
ル:ル Verb-IV ; ! melt
エセ:エセ Verb-TV ; ! answer
キ:キ Verb-TV ; ! do (tv)
アㇽパ:アㇽパ Verb-IV ; ! go (iv)
ラィ:ラィ Verb-IV ; ! die (iv)
ヌカㇽ:ヌカㇽ Verb-TV ; ! see
モンラィケ:モンラィケ Verb-IV ; ! do work 
チㇱ:チㇱ Verb-IV ; ! cry
アㇱ:アㇱ Verb-IV ; ! stand
ヘト゚ク:ヘト゚ク Verb-IV ; ! come out/be born
カリ:カリ Verb-IV ; ! spin
チ:チ Verb-TV ; ! get burnt/dry/boiled
アㇽカ:アㇽカ Verb-IV ; ! hurt
フレ:フレ Verb-IV ; ! be red/pink NEW
ウヌカㇽ:ウヌカㇽ Verb-IV ; ! be red 
ラㇺテ:ラㇺテ Verb-TV ; ! dim
オハレ:オハレ Verb-TV ; ! open/empty
ヤンケ:ヤンケ Verb-TV ; ! raise/lift
オハㇰ:オハㇰ Verb-IV ; ! be shallow
シネウェ:シネウェ Verb-IV ; ! visit
アシㇼ:アシㇼ Verb-IV ; ! be new
イロンネ:イロンネ Verb-IV ; ! be thick
オマレ:オマレ Verb-TV ; ! dig
ハルコㇿ:ハルコㇿ Verb-IV ; ! be fatty
イカ:イカ Verb-IV ; ! overflow
イカㇲマ:イカㇲマ Verb-IV ; ! excessive
ホㇰ:ホㇰ Verb-TV ; ! buy
テㇲカオ:テㇲカオ Verb-TV ; ! knit
ヤㇲケ:ヤㇲケ Verb-IV ; ! wash hands
フライェ:フライェ Verb-TV ; ! wash
サㇳ:サㇳ Verb-IV ; ! be dry
イサㇺ:イサㇺ Verb-IV ; ! not exist
ウㇲ:ウㇲ Verb-TV ; ! attach to
エラㇺポキウェン:エラㇺポキウェン Verb-TV ; ! have pity
ルラ:ルラ Verb-TV ; ! carry
ヘセ:ヘセ Verb-IV ; ! breathe
トゥミコㇿ:トゥミコㇿ Verb-IV ; ! fight
モナサㇷ゚:モナサㇷ゚ Verb-IV ; ! be busy
チゥ:チゥ Verb-TV ; ! sting
ヌカㇽ:ヌカㇽ Verb-TV ; ! see
オケウェ:オケウェ Verb-TV ; ! chase
エィワンケ:エィワンケ Verb-TV ; ! use
トゥカン:トゥカン Verb-TV ; ! attack (with guns/bows)
アㇰ:アㇰ Verb-IV ; ! shoot
オマレ:オマレ Verb-IV ; ! fill
テㇲカㇻ:テㇲカㇻ Verb-IV ; ! send a message
アフㇷ゚カㇻ:アフㇷ゚カㇻ Verb-TV ; ! receive
キㇰ:キㇰ Verb-TV ; ! hit
ヘトゥク:ヘトゥク Verb-IV ; ! be born
チュプ:チュプ Verb-TV ; ! reverse
ヤィコプンテㇰ:ヤィコプンテㇰ Verb-IV ; ! be happy
トゥラシ:トゥラシ Verb-IV ; ! go upstream
ニㇳネ:ニㇳネ Verb-IV ; ! be fierce
ケセアンパ:ケセアンパ Verb-TV ; ! chase
オㇲコニ:オㇲコニ Verb-TV ; ! catch up to
ウォセ:ウォセ Verb-IV ; ! howl
アマ:アマ Verb-TV ; ! put
アヌ:アヌ Verb-TV ; ! put/place (sg)
トゥラㇺコㇿ:トゥラㇺコㇿ Verb-IV ; ! be cowardly
アンテ:アンテ Verb-TV ; ! send
モソソ:モソソ Verb-TV ; ! wake someone up
イルㇲカ:イルㇲカ Verb-IV ; ! get mad
リテン:リテン Verb-IV ; ! be soft/gentle
イラㇺクㇽセレ:イラㇺクㇽセレ Verb-IV ; ! be frightful
トゥㇽセ:トゥㇽセ Verb-IV ; ! drop
マ:マ Verb-IV ; ! swim
マィアィケ:マィアィケ Verb-IV ; ! be itchy
エラミㇱカリ:エラミㇱカリ Verb-TV ; ! not know
エシカルン:エシカルン Verb-TV ; ! recall
パカㇱヌ:パカㇱヌ Verb-TV ; ! teach to
カㇻ:カㇻ Verb-TV ; ! make
オカイ:オカイ Verb-IV ; ! exist (pl)
アリ:アリ Verb-TV ; ! place  (pl)
アシㇼ:アシㇼ Verb-IV ; ! be new
ホプン:ホプン Verb-IV ; ! get up
ラン:ラン Verb-IV ; ! descend
コㇿ:コㇿ Verb-TV ; ! have
ヤイヌ:ヤイヌ Verb-TV ; ! imagine
